Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 43
REGISTRATION OF RECREATIONAL VEHICLES

33-43-101 to 33-43-107. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article repealed, p. 925, § 19, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 16 of chapter 62, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1984, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.